Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,128
Class V school district; sale of site; petition; contents.

The school district may file a petition in the district court of the county in which such real estate as described in section 79-10,127 is situated, setting forth the terms and conditions of the original deed from the State of Nebraska, the provisions of sections 79-10,127 to 79-10,135, and the findings of the board of education as to the desirability of sale.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 2, p. 985;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1062;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 774.